Maine, session 132, LD2205.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 4 MRSA §153, sub-§3, as amended by PL 2025, c. 436, §2, is further
amended to read:
3. Western Aroostook. Western Aroostook consists of the municipalities and
unorganized territory known as Hamlin Plantation, Cyr Plantation, T17 R3, Grand Isle, T17
R4, T16 R5, T15 R6, Winterville Plantation, T15 R8, T15 R9, T14 R10, T14 R11, T14
R12, T14 R13, T14 R14, T14 R15, T14 R16 and all municipalities and unorganized
territory in Aroostook County lying to the west and north of these. The District Court for
Western Aroostook must be held at Fort Kent.
Page 1 - 132LR3042(02)